it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano: Guanti da football americano; Porte da football americano; Supporti per palla e holder da football americano; Attrezzatura protettiva da football americano; Scarpe da football americano; Attrezzatura da allenamento da football americano; Palloni da football americano
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Käsineet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Maalitolpat, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Tiit ja pallopidikkeet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Suojavarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Kengät, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Harjoitteluvarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaiset jalkapallot
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball: Amerikaifutball-kesztyűk; Amerikaifutball-kapuk; Amerikaifutball-rugók és -tartók; Amerikaifutball-védőfelszerelés; Amerikaifutball-cipők; Amerikaifutball-edzőfelszerelés; Amerikai futballok
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球: 美式橄榄球手套; 美式橄榄球门柱; 美式橄榄球球座/支架; 美式橄榄球护具; 美式橄榄球鞋; 美式橄榄球训练装备; 美式橄榄球
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football: American Football handschoenen; American Football doelpalen; American Football kicking tees en holders; American Football beschermende uitrusting; American Football schoenen; American Football trainingsmaterialen; American Footballs
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football: American Football Gloves; American Football Goal Posts; American Football Kicking Tees & Holders; American Football Protective Gear; American Football Shoes; American Football Training Equipment; American Footballs
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll: Amerikansk fotboll handskar; Amerikansk fotboll målstolpar; Amerikansk fotboll kickingtees & hållare; Amerikansk fotboll skyddsutrustning; Amerikanska fotbollsskor; Amerikansk fotboll träningsredskap; Amerikansk fotbollar
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain: Gants de football américain; Poteaux de but de football américain; Tees et supports de ballons de football américain; Équipements de protection pour le football américain; Chaussures de football américain; Équipement d'entraînement pour le football américain; Ballons de football américain
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold: Amerikansk fodbold – handsker; Amerikansk fodbold – målstolper; Amerikansk fodbold – kicking tees og holdere; Amerikansk fodbold – beskyttelsesudstyr; Sko til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – træningsudstyr; Amerikansk fodbold – bolde
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball: Hansker for amerikansk fotball; Målstenger for amerikansk fotball; Sparke-tees og holdere for amerikansk fotball; Beskyttelsesutstyr for amerikansk fotball; Sko til amerikansk fotball; Treningsutstyr for amerikansk fotball; Amerikanske fotballer
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet: Rukavice za američki nogomet; Stative za golove američkog nogometa; Postolja i držači za loptu za američki nogomet; Zaštitna oprema za američki nogomet; Tenisice za američki nogomet; Oprema za trening američkog nogometa; Lopte za američki nogomet
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼: 미식축구 장갑; 미식축구 골대; 미식축구 키킹 티셔츠 및 홀더; 미식축구 보호 장비; 미식축구화; 미식축구 훈련 장비; 미식축구
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański: Rękawice do futbolu amerykańskiego; Słupki do bramek do futbolu amerykańskiego; Podstawki i uchwyty do wykopywania piłki do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacze do futbolu amerykańskiego; Buty do futbolu amerykańskiego; Sprzęt treningowy do futbolu amerykańskiego; Piłki do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano: Luvas de Futebol Americano; Postes de Golo de Futebol Americano; Kicking Tees e Suportes de Bola de Futebol Americano; Equipamento de Proteção de Futebol Americano; Trenós de futebol americano; Equipamento de Treino de Futebol Americano; Bolas de Futebol Americano
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu: Amerikan Futbolu Eldivenleri; Amerikan Futbolu Kale Direkleri; Amerikan Futbolu Şut Çekme Tee'leri ve Top Tutucular; Amerikan Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipman; Amerikan Futbolu Ayakkabıları; Amerikan Futbolu Antrenman Ekipmanları; Amerikan Futbolu Topları
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal: Rukavice na americký futbal; Bránky pre americký futbal; Stojany a držiaky lopty pre americký futbal; Ochranné vybavenie pre americký futbal; Obuv na americký futbal; Tréningové vybavenie pre americký futbal; Lopty na americký futbal
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球: 美式足球手套; 美式足球球門柱; 美式足球踢球 T 恤和球架; 美式足球護具; 美式足球鞋; 美式足球訓練器材; 美式足球
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football: Handschuhe für American Football; Torpfosten für American Football; Kicking-Tees und -Halter für American Football; Schutzbekleidung für American Football; Schuhe für American Football; Trainingsausrüstung für American Football; American Footballs
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール: アメリカンフットボール用グローブ; アメリカンフット用ボールゴールポスト; アメリカンフットボール用キッキングティー&ホルダー; アメリカンフットボール用プロテクター; アメリカンフットボールシューズ; アメリカンフットボール用トレーニング機器; ボール
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол: Перчатки для американского футбола; Ворота для американского футбола; Подставки и держатели для мячей для американского футбола; Защитная экипировка для американского футбола; Обувь для американского футбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для американского футбола; Мячи для американского футбола
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο: Γάντια αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Στύλοι τερμάτων αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Βάσεις & υποστηρίγματα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Παπούτσια αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προπονητικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Μπάλες αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล: ถุงมืออเมริกันฟุตบอล; เสาประตูอเมริกันฟุตบอล; แท่นสำหรับซ้อมเตะและตัวแขวนอเมริกันฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันอเมริกันฟุตบอล; รองเท้าอเมริกันฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมอเมริกันฟุตบอล; อเมริกันฟุตบอล
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол: Ръкавици за американски футбол; Врати за американски футбол; Държачи и уреди за слагане на топката за удар за американски футбол; Защитна екипировка за американски футбол; Обувки за американски футбол; Тренировъчно оборудване за американски футбол; Топки за американски футбол
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american: Mănuși de fotbal american; Stâlpi de poartă pentru fotbal american; Teuri și suporturi pentru fotbal american; Echipament de protecție pentru fotbal american; Pantofi pentru fotbal american; Echipament de antrenament pentru fotbal american; Mingi de fotbal american
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano: Guantes de fútbol americano; Postes de fútbol americano; Soportes para balones de fútbol americano; Equipo de protección de fútbol americano; Calzado de fútbol americano; Equipo de entrenamiento de fútbol americano; Balones de fútbol americano
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Găng tay chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Cột gôn bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Cột phát bóng và giá đỡ bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đồ bảo hộ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Giày đá bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Trang thiết bị tập luyện bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Bóng bầu dục Mỹ
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas: Amerikietiškojo futbolo pirštinės; Amerikietiškojo futbolo vartų virpstai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo kamuolio išspyrimo padėkliukai ir laikikliai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo apsauginės priemonės; Amerikietiškojo futbolo bateliai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo treniruočių įranga; Amerikietiškojo futbolo kamuoliai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano: Luvas de futebol americano; Traves de futebol americano; Suportes e suporte para bola para futebol americano; Equipamento de proteção para futebol americano; Chuteiras de futebol americano; Equipamentos para treino de futebol americano; Bolas de futebol americano
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet: Rokavice za ameriški nogomet; Vratnice za ameriški nogomet; Ploščki in stojala za udarjanje za ameriški nogomet; Zaščitna oprema za ameriški nogomet; Čevlji za ameriški nogomet; Oprema za vadbo ameriškega nogometa; Žoge za ameriški nogomet
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal: Rukavice pro americký fotbal; Branky na americký fotbal; Výkopové podstavce a držáky na americký fotbal; Ochranná výstroj pro americký fotbal; Boty na americký fotbal; Tréninková výstroj pro americký fotbal; Míče na americký fotbal